Utah statutes.
41-1a-1313.   Third degree felony to possess motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, or parts without identification number -- Presumption of knowledge.

(1)  It is a third degree felony for a person to have in his possession any motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer, or any part or parts of a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer, from which any identification number has been removed, defaced, destroyed, obliterated, or so covered as to be concealed, or where the identification number has been altered or changed in any manner.

(2)  A person having possession of any motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer or part of them under this section is presumed prima facie to have knowledge of this condition.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 1, 1992 General Session

